District of Columbia statutes.
16-3106

Issues to be made up in plenary proceeding; jury; compelling payment of costs.

In a plenary proceeding provided for by section 16-3105 , the Probate Court shall give judgment, or decree upon the bill an answer, or upon bill, answer, depositions, or finding of the jury. In all cases of contest, the court may award costs to the party deemed entitled thereto, and may compel payment by exercising its contempt power, or by attachment and sequestration of the property as provided by section 16-3104 .

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 600, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 561, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(l)(2)
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(nn), 45 DCR 745
1973 Ed., § 16-3106.
1981 Ed., § 16-3106.